apertium-sme-smj.smj.twol
"e:å in certain stem types with å as root vowel"
 e:å <=> å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X4:0 [ j [ # | #: ] ] ;  ! 1) [ADD examples here]
         å Cns:* _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;            ! 2) [ADD examples here]
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Q2:0 ;                    ! 3) gådet : gådåv, jåhtet : jådåv
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y2:0 ;                    ! 4) gådet : gådå,  jåhtet : jåhtå
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y3:0 ;                    ! 5) jåhtet : jåhtåm
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5:0 ;                    ! 6) verb derivation
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y7:0 t: j [ (Hyph) [ # | #: ] | Vow: ] ; ! 7) noun derivation låhkke:låhkkåsj
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7:0 X7:0 l ;             ! 8) noun derivation låhkke:låhkålasj
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 [s (%>:) i ([s ([k a|á])|m ([m e])|(h) t ([t e])]) |  j [[#|#:]|Cns: ]] ;             ! 9) noun derivation
         å Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ;                     ! 10) dåhpe : dåbåsj
         å Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] X4:0 X8:0 ;
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X4:0)  (X8:0) [m|t|d|s (%>:) i [m|t|s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ;

	 	! The first subrule gives Ill. sg. of even-stem
! No shorter version here, bec. of no å-å effect
! The second subrule gives oblique of uneven stem
! The third one is vowel harmony, e:å after root vowel å

! 3)
!€ gådeQ2v
!€ gådå0v
!€ jåhteQ2v
!€ jå0då0v

! 4)
!€ gådeY2
!€ gådå0
!€ jåhteY2
!€ jåhtå0

! 5)
!€ jåhteY3m
!€ jåhtå0m

! 7)
!€ låhkkeY7tj
!€ låhkkå0sj



! e:u
! - -

!"e:u in Verb Derivations" !This holds only for one word (TO)
! e:u <=> Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y4:0 ;
! árret : árrusit

! e:a
! ----

!"e:a in Verb Derivation" !not productive
! e:a <=> [Cns:|#:] [ (Vow:) Vow: - [å:|a:|i:|u:] ] Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5:0 ; ! láhppet : láhpadit

! e:0
! ----
 "e-stem vowel deletion"
  e:0 <=> Vow: (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) [ # | #: ] g:k _ [ # | #: ] ; !clitic ge:k
          Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives

!€ ielvveY9ut
!€ 0ælvv00ut




! i-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -


! i:á
! - -

"i:á in Verb Derivation"
 i:á <=> Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5:0 ;
! guollit : guollár


! o-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -

! The duplicates of the three lines of the two following rules are
! there to resolve the => conflict between the two rules.

"o:u in certain stem types 1"
o:u  => Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) (Q1:0 | Q4:0) X5:0 j n ; ! Q1 X5 ComSg. !parenthesis (Q1:0) bec of no CG in certain words. elujn
        Cns:  _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !Odd-syllable
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: ] ; ! Y1=  Y2= Y3=PrfPrc
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: ; !verb der. (u/a/å)d
        Cns:  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ; !verb der. alla
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X5:0 j n ; ! Com sg of Actor nouns elujn
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! IllSg of Actor nouns
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ; ! báhko : bágusj, goahte : godásj
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ; ! PrsPrc dim
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X8:0) ;        ! Px áhkko:áhkkum
              _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:0|Q4:0] X4:0 X8:0 ;        !  1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) ([Q1:0|Q4:0]) X5: j n [a [m|t]|i [s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; !Px Com


"o:u in certain stem types 2"
o:u <= Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg
!       Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) (Q1:0 | Q4:0) X5:0 j n ; !parenthesis (Q1:0) bec of no CG in certain words. outcommented because rule is facultative:elujn/ælojn
        Cns:  _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !Odd-syllable
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: ] ; ! Y1=  Y2= Y3=PrfPrc
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: ; !verb der. (u/a/å)d
        Cns:  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ; !verb der. alla
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X5:0 j n ; ! Com sg of Actor nouns elujn
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! IllSg of Actor nouns
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ; ! báhko : bágusj, goahte : godásj
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ; ! PrsPrc dim
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X8:0) ;        ! Px áhkko:áhkkum
              _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:0|Q4:0] X4:0 X8:0 ;        ! 1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) ([Q1:0|Q4:0]) X5: j n [a [m|t]|i [s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; !Px Com



!Old o:u rules
! o:u <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ X4: j | Q1: X5: ] ; !X4 IllSg, Q1 X5 ComSg.
! o:u <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg, Q1 X5 ComSg.

"u:o in contracted nouns"
 u:o <=> Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) [ Q3: | X6: ] ; !æddnu:ænoj, boahttsu:boatsoj

"o-stem vowel deletion"
 o:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y9:0 ; !in short passives
 
! å-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -

"å:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs"
 å:e <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
         Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: [
 d a
 |m (a)
 |n
 |n a [m|t]
 |[ s t | n ] i [ h t t e | m m e | s | s [ k a | á ] ]
 |s (k) (a)
 |s t a [m|t]
 |t
 |v
 ] :0 - X4: (:0 - X8:) [:0 - s:|:0 - m: |:0 - t: |:0 - d: (a:) ]  ; !All this to prevent change in Px
! låhkåt : låhkke

"å:i in Actor nouns of even-syllable verbs"
 å:i <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 ( X5:0 ) j ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
! låhkåt : låhkkijt

"å-stem vowel deletion"
 å:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives
 
! alternations valid for several stem types
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

"Stem vowel deletion in even-syllable verbs, imp 3sg, 3du, 2pl, 3pl"
 Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [Y1:0|Q8:] ;
      where Vx in ( a å e ) ;

!€ ielvveY1up
!€ 0ælvv00up

!€ giessaY1up
!€ giess00up

!€ bårråY1up
!€ bårr00up

!€
!€


! Consonant gradation rules
! -------------------------

! New rules, without conflicts
! The numbering of rules refer to the overview in Spiiks grammar
! Thus !S7-3 means "Series 1, 3-letter patterns", etc.

! Deletion rules
! - - - - - - - -

"Consonant gradation b:0"
b:0 <=> Vow: ( [l|b] )     _ m         Vow: (StemCns:) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S7-2 bbn:b0n, bn:0n
!	    Vow:           _ [d|j|l|n|r|s] Vow: (StemCns:) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-2
	    Vow: [ j|l|r ] _ b             Vow: (StemCns:) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-3
	    Vow:           _ b: m          Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6:             ; ! III-I special gradation ! bbm:m
	    Vow:   b:      _    m          Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6:             ; ! III-I special gradation ! bbm:m

"Consonant gradation d:0"
d:0 <=> Vow: ( d )             _ [ n | j ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S7-2 ddn:d0n, dn:0n
        Vow: ( d )             _   n   j   Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4 and S7, dnj:nj
        Vow: [ b | j | r | v ] _ d         Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
        Vow:                   _ d: n      Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ;             ! III-I special gradation ddn:n
        Vow: d:                _    n      Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ;             ! III-I special gradation ddn:n
        Vow:                   _ t:s j (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;             ! oajváladtj# : oajvála0sj0

"Consonant gradation g:0"
g:0 <=> Vow: ( g )       _    [ñ|ń|ŋ|l|n] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S7-2
    	Vow: [ j|l|r|v ] _ g          Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
    	Vow:             _ g: [ñ|ń|ŋ] Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ; ! III-I special gradation
    	Vow:   g:        _    [ñ|ń|ŋ] Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ; ! III-I special gradation

"Consonant gradation k:0"
k:0 <=> Vow:     k         _ n   Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3
    	Vow:     k         _ t j Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4
    	Vow: [ j|l|m|r|v ] _ k   Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
    	Vow:     h         _ k   Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S4, preasp stops

"Consonant gradation l:0"
l:0 <=> Vow:   l       _ [ d|j|t|n ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3
		Vow:   l       _ t j         Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4
		Vow:           _ l           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8, II-I
		Vow: [ j|b|v ] (h) _ l       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9

"Consonant gradation m:0"
m:0 <=> Vow: m         _ [ b|p ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3
		Vow:           _ m        Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8, II-I
		Vow: [ j|l|r|v|t ] _ m       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
		Vow:           _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ; ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables

"Consonant gradation n:0"
n:0 <=> Vow:         n           _ d           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3
		Vow:         n           _ t ([ j|s ]) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4
		Vow:                     _ n ( j )       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8, II-I, also palat.
		Vow: [ b|j (h) |l|ñ|ń|ŋ|r|v (h) |m|g ] _ n           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9, III-II
		Vow: [ b|r|v ]           _ n j         Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4, III-II

"Consonant gradation p:0"
p:0 <=> Vow:         p   _ (%>:) (»:) ( j ) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S7-4 j
        Vow:         p   _ t ([j|s])        Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4 ppts:pts
        Vow: [ j|l|r|v ] _ p             Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
        Vow:   h         _ p             Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S4 hpp:hp
        Vow:         p   _ [k|s (j)]        Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

"Consonant gradation s:0"
s:0 <=> Vow:                   _ s ( [ j|k|m|n|t|p|v|ń|ŋ|ñ ] ) (%>:) (»:) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S8 II-I
        Vow:                   _ s j [ k|m|v ]       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4
        Vow: [ b|j|l|m|n|r|v ] _ s                   Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
        Vow: [ r|l|m ]         _ s j                 Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
        Vow: [ r|l|n|j ]       _ s k                 Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
        Vow: [ j|m|n|v|l ]     _ s t                 Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
        Vow: r                 _ s j t               Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9 rssjt:rsjt
        Vow: s:                _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;                                         ! This is a word fin simpl, ss# -> s#, and not CG
        Vow:                   _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;                                  ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables

!"Consonant gradation s:0"
!s:0 <=> Vow: s                 _ ( [ j|k|m|n|t ] ) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S8 II-I
!        Vow: s                 _ j [ k|m|v ]       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-4
!        Vow: [ b|j|l|m|n|r|v ] _ s                 Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
!        Vow: [ r|l|m ]         _ s j               Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
!        Vow: [ r|l|n ]         _ s k               Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
!        Vow: [ j|m|n|v ]       _ s t               Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9-4
!        Vow: r s               _ j t               Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9 rssjt:rsjt
!        Vow: s:                _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) #: ;                                       ! This is a word fin simpl, ss# -> s#, and not CG
!        Vow:                   _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;                                ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables
